Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 12.028 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Recognizing the necessity for grouping related functions of organizational units and
administrative bodies in order to promote greater economy, efficiency, and
improved administration, the Governor, the Kentucky Economic Development
Partnership as created in KRS 154.10-010, and other elected state executive officers
may propose to the General Assembly, for its approval, changes in the state
government organizational structure which may include the creation, alteration, or
abolition of any organizational unit or administrative body and the transfer of
functions, personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, and records from one (1)
organizational unit or administrative body to another.
(2) Any reorganization proposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be set forth
in a reorganization plan which shall be filed with the Legislative Research
Commission. The plan shall include:
(a) An explanation of each proposed change, including the need for the change;
(b) An estimate of any reduction or increase in expenditures, itemized as far as
practicable, which the promulgating officer expects will result from the
reorganization;
(c) A description of any improvements in the management, delivery of state
services, and efficiency of state government operations which the
promulgating officer expects will be realized as a result of the reorganization;
and
(d) Specification of the effects of the reorganization on the budget and personnel
of each affected organizational unit or administrative body, including but not
limited to the amount of funds and the number of employees that will be
transferred from one (1) organizational unit or administrative body to another,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1836
any reductions in the state workforce resulting from the reorganization, and
the methods to be utilized to achieve such reductions.
(3) The Legislative Research Commission or the Legislative Oversight and
Investigations Committee may monitor the implementation of any reorganization
plan to determine the extent to which the anticipated improvements in economy,
efficiency, or administration have been realized as a result of the reorganization and
shall report its findings to the General Assembly.
(4) Funds transferred due to reorganization shall be maintained in separately designated
accounts. Any excess funds resulting from a reorganization shall lapse to the
general fund surplus account.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 8:44 AM Jacketed